New Jersey, session 222, S562.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: [1.  Section 1 of P.L.1995, c.23 (C.47:1A-1.1) is amended to read as follows: 1.    As used in P.L.1963, c.73 (C.47:1A-1 et seq.) as amended and supplemented: "Biotechnology" means any technique that uses living organisms, or parts of living organisms, to make or modify products, to improve plants or animals, or to develop micro-organisms for specific uses; including the industrial use of recombinant DNA, cell fusion, and novel bioprocessing techniques. "Custodian of a government record" or "custodian" means in the case of a municipality, the municipal clerk and in the case of any other public agency, the officer officially designated by formal action of that agency's director or governing body, as the case may be. "Government record" or "record" means any paper, written or printed book, document, drawing, map, plan, photograph, microfilm, data processed or image processed document, information stored or maintained electronically or by sound-recording or in a similar device, or any copy thereof, that has been made, maintained or kept on file in the course of his or its official business by any officer, commission, agency or authority of the State or of any political subdivision thereof, including subordinate boards thereof, or that has been received in the course of his or its official business by any such officer, commission, agency, or authority of the State or of any political subdivision thereof, including subordinate boards thereof.  The terms shall not include inter-agency or intra-agency advisory, consultative, or deliberative material. A government record shall not include the following information which is deemed to be confidential for the purposes of P.L.1963, c.73 (C.47:1A-1 et seq.) as amended and supplemented: information received by a member of the Legislature from a constituent or information held by a member of the Legislature concerning a constituent, including, but not limited to, information in written form or contained in any e-mail or computer data base, or in any telephone record whatsoever, unless it is information the constituent is required by law to transmit; any memorandum, correspondence, notes, report or other communication prepared by, or for, the specific use of a member of the Legislature in the course of the member's official duties, except that this provision shall not apply to an otherwise publicly-accessible report which is required by law to be submitted to the Legislature or its members; any copy, reproduction or facsimile of any photograph, negative or print, including instant photographs and videotapes of the body, or any portion of the body, of a deceased person, taken by or for the medical examiner at the scene of death or in the course of a post mortem examination or autopsy made by or caused to be made by the medical examiner except: when used in a criminal action or proceeding in this State which relates to the death of that person, for the use as a court of this State permits, by order after good cause has been shown and after written notification of the request for the court order has been served at least five days before the order is made upon the county prosecutor for the county in which the post mortem examination or autopsy occurred, for use in the field of forensic pathology or for use in medical or scientific education or research, or for use by any law enforcement agency in this State or any other state or federal law enforcement agency; criminal investigatory records; the portion of any criminal record concerning a person's detection, apprehension, arrest, detention, trial or disposition for unlawful manufacturing, distributing, or dispensing, or possessing or having under control with intent to manufacture, distribute, or dispense, marijuana or hashish in violation of paragraph (11) of subsection b. of N.J.S.2C:35-5, or a lesser amount of marijuana or hashish in violation of paragraph (12) of subsection b. of that section, or a violation of either of those paragraphs and a violation of subsection a. of section 1 of P.L.1987, c.101 (C.2C:35-7) or subsection a. of section 1 of P.L.1997, c.327 (C.2C:35-7.1) for distributing, dispensing, or possessing, or having under control with intent to distribute or dispense, on or within 1,000 feet of any school property, or on or within 500 feet of the real property comprising a public housing facility, public park, or public building, or for obtaining, possessing, using, being under the influence of, or failing to make lawful disposition of marijuana or hashish in violation of paragraph (3) or (4) of subsection a., or subsection b., or subsection c. of N.J.S.2C:35-10, or for a violation of any of those provisions and a violation of N.J.S.2C:36-2 for using or possessing with intent to use drug paraphernalia with that marijuana or hashish; victims' records, except that a victim of a crime shall have access to the victim's own records; any written request by a crime victim for a record to which the victim is entitled to access as provided in this section, including, but not limited to, any law enforcement agency report, domestic violence offense report, and temporary or permanent restraining order; personal firearms records, except for use by any person authorized by law to have access to these records or for use by any government agency, including any court or law enforcement agency, for purposes of the administration of justice; personal identifying information received by the Division of Fish and Wildlife in the Department of Environmental Protection in connection with the issuance of any license authorizing hunting with a firearm.  For the purposes of this paragraph, personal identifying information shall include, but not be limited to, identity, name, address, social security number, telephone number, fax number, driver's license number, email address, or social media address of any applicant or licensee; trade secrets and proprietary commercial or financial information obtained from any source.  For the purposes of this paragraph, trade secrets shall include data processing software obtained by a public body under a licensing agreement which prohibits its disclosure; any record within the attorney-client privilege.  This paragraph shall not be construed as exempting from access attorney or consultant bills or invoices except that such bills or invoices may be redacted to remove any information protected by the attorney-client privilege; administrative or technical information regarding computer hardware, software and networks which, if disclosed, would jeopardize computer security; emergency or security information or procedures for any buildings or facility which, if disclosed, would jeopardize security of the building or facility or persons therein; security measures and surveillance techniques which, if disclosed, would create a risk to the safety of persons, property, electronic data or software; information which, if disclosed, would give an advantage to competitors or bidders; information generated by or on behalf of public employers or public employees in connection with any sexual harassment complaint filed with a public employer or with any grievance filed by or against an individual or in connection with collective negotiations, including documents and statements of strategy or negotiating position; information which is a communication between a public agency and its insurance carrier, administrative service organization or risk management office; information which is to be kept confidential pursuant to court order; any copy of form DD-214, NGB-22, or that form, issued by the United States Government, or any other certificate of honorable discharge, or copy thereof, from active service or the reserves of a branch of the Armed Forces of the United States, or from service in the organized militia of the State, that has been filed by an individual with a public agency, except that a veteran or the veteran's spouse or surviving spouse shall have access to the veteran's own records; any copy of an oath of allegiance, oath of office or any affirmation taken upon assuming the duties of any public office, or that oath or affirmation, taken by a current or former officer or employee in any public office or position in this State or in any county or municipality of this State, including members of the Legislative Branch, Executive Branch, Judicial Branch, and all law enforcement entities, except that the full name, title, and oath date of that person contained therein shall not be deemed confidential; that portion of any document which discloses the social security number, credit card number, unlisted telephone number or driver license number of any person, or, in accordance with section 2 of P.L.2021, c.371 (C.47:1B-2), judicial officer, prosecutor, or law enforcement officer, or, as defined in section 1 of P.L.2021, c.371 (C.47:1B-1), any immediate family member thereof; except for use by any government agency, including any court or law enforcement agency, in carrying out its functions, or any private person or entity acting on behalf thereof, or any private person or entity seeking to enforce payment of court-ordered child support; except with respect to the disclosure of driver information by the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission as permitted by section 2 of P.L.1997, c.188 (C.39:2-3.4); and except that a social security number contained in a record required by law to be made, maintained or kept on file by a public agency shall be disclosed when access to the document or disclosure of that information is not otherwise prohibited by State or federal law, regulation or order or by State statute, resolution of either or both houses of the Legislature, Executive Order of the Governor, rule of court or regulation promulgated under the authority of any statute or executive order of the Governor; a list of persons identifying themselves as being in need of special assistance in the event of an emergency maintained by a municipality for public safety purposes pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2017, c.266 (C.40:48-2.67); and a list of persons identifying themselves as being in need of special assistance in the event of an emergency maintained by a county for public safety purposes pursuant to section 6 of P.L.2011, c.178 (C.App.A:9-43.13). A government record shall not include, with regard to any public institution of higher education, the following information which is deemed to be privileged and confidential: pedagogical, scholarly and/or academic research records and/or the specific details of any research project conducted under the auspices of a public higher education institution in New Jersey, including, but not limited to, research, development information, testing procedures, or information regarding test participants, related to the development or testing of any pharmaceutical or pharmaceutical delivery system, except that a custodian may not deny inspection of a government record or part thereof that gives the name, title, expenditures, source and amounts of funding and date when the final project summary of any research will be available; test questions, scoring keys and other examination data pertaining to the administration of an examination for employment or academic examination; records of pursuit of charitable contributions or records containing the identity of a donor of a gift if the donor requires non-disclosure of the donor's identity as a condition of making the gift provided that the donor has not received any benefits of or from the institution of higher education in connection with such gift other than a request for memorialization or dedication; valuable or rare collections of books or documents obtained by gift, grant, bequest or devise conditioned upon limited public access; information contained on individual admission applications; and information concerning student records or grievance or disciplinary proceedings against a student to the extent disclosure would reveal the identity of the student. "Personal firearms record" means any information contained in a background investigation conducted by the chief of police, the county prosecutor, or the Superintendent of State Police, of any applicant for a permit to purchase a handgun, firearms identification card license, or firearms registration; any application for a permit to purchase a handgun, firearms identification card license, or firearms registration; any document reflecting the issuance or denial of a permit to purchase a handgun, firearms identification card license, or firearms registration; and any permit to purchase a handgun, firearms identification card license, or any firearms license, certification, certificate, form of register, or registration statement.  For the purposes of this paragraph, information contained in a background investigation shall include, but not be limited to, identity, name, address, social security number, phone number, fax number, driver's license number, email address, social media address of any applicant, licensee, registrant or permit holder. "Public agency" or "agency" means any of the principal departments in the Executive Branch of State Government, and any division, board, bureau, office, commission or other instrumentality within or created by such department; the Legislature of the State and any office, board, bureau or commission within or created by the Legislative Branch; and any independent State authority, commission, instrumentality or agency.  The terms also mean any political subdivision of the State or combination of political subdivisions, and any division, board, bureau, office, commission or other instrumentality within or created by a political subdivision of the State or combination of political subdivisions, and any independent authority, commission, instrumentality or agency created by a political subdivision or combination of political subdivisions. "Law enforcement agency" means a public agency, or part thereof, determined by the Attorney General to have law enforcement responsibilities. "Law enforcement officer" means a person whose public duties include the power to act as an officer for the detection, apprehension, arrest and conviction of offenders against the laws of this State. "Constituent" means any State resident or other person communicating with a member of the Legislature. "Judicial officer" means any active, formerly active, or retired federal, state, county, or municipal judge, including a judge of the Tax Court and any other court of limited jurisdiction established, altered, or abolished by law, a judge of the Office of Administrative Law, a judge of the Division of Workers' Compensation, and any other judge established by law who serves in the executive branch. "Member of the Legislature" means any person elected or selected to serve in the New Jersey Senate or General Assembly. "Criminal investigatory record" means a record which is not required by law to be made, maintained or kept on file that is held by a law enforcement agency which pertains to any criminal investigation or related civil enforcement proceeding. "Victim's record" means an individually-identifiable file or document held by a victims' rights agency which pertains directly to a victim of a crime except that a victim of a crime shall have access to the victim's own records. "Victim of a crime" means a person who has suffered personal or psychological injury or death or incurs loss of or injury to personal or real property as a result of a crime, or if such a person is deceased or incapacitated, a member of that person's immediate family. "Victims' rights agency" means a public agency, or part thereof, the primary responsibility of which is providing services, including, but not limited to, food, shelter, or clothing, medical, psychiatric, psychological or legal services or referrals, information and referral services, counseling and support services, or financial services to victims of crimes, including victims of sexual assault, domestic violence, violent crime, child endangerment, child abuse or child neglect, and the Victims of Crime Compensation Board, established pursuant to P.L.1971, c.317 (C.52:4B-1 et seq.) and continued as the Victims of Crime Compensation Office pursuant to P.L.2007, c.95 (C.52:4B-3.2 et al.) and Reorganization Plan No. 001-2008. (cf: P.L.2021, c.371, s.10)] 1.  Section 1 of P.L.1995, c.23 (C.47:1A-1.1) is amended to read as follows: 1.  As used in P.L.1963, c.73 (C.47:1A-1 et seq.) as amended and supplemented: "Biotechnology" means any technique that uses living organisms, or parts of living organisms, to make or modify products, to improve plants or animals, or to develop micro-organisms for specific uses; including the industrial use of recombinant DNA, cell fusion, and novel bioprocessing techniques. "Custodian of a government record" or "custodian" means in the case of a municipality, the municipal clerk and in the case of any other public agency, the officer officially designated by formal action of that agency's director or governing body, as the case may be. Elected official means any person holding a State or local government office which, under the State Constitution or by law, is filled by the registered voters of a jurisdiction at an election, including a person appointed, selected or otherwise designated to fill a vacancy in such office, but does not mean an official of a political party. Elected official also includes any person seeking election to a public office. "Government record" or "record" means any paper, written or printed book, document, drawing, map, plan, photograph, microfilm, data processed or image processed document, information stored or maintained electronically or by sound-recording or in a similar device, or any copy thereof, that has been made, maintained or kept on file in the course of his or its official business by any officer, commission, agency or authority of the State or of any political subdivision thereof, including subordinate boards thereof, or that has been received in the course of his or its official business by any such officer, commission, agency, or authority of the State or of any political subdivision thereof, including subordinate boards thereof.  The terms shall not include inter-agency or intra-agency advisory, consultative, or deliberative material. A government record shall not include the following information which is deemed to be confidential for the purposes of P.L.1963, c.73 (C.47:1A-1 et seq.) as amended and supplemented: information received by a member of the Legislature from a constituent or information held by a member of the Legislature concerning a constituent, including, but not limited to, information in written form or contained in any e-mail or computer data base, or in any telephone record whatsoever, unless it is information the constituent is required by law to transmit; any memorandum, correspondence, notes, report or other communication prepared by, or for, the specific use of a member of the Legislature in the course of the member's official duties, except that this provision shall not apply to an otherwise publicly-accessible report which is required by law to be submitted to the Legislature or its members; any copy, reproduction or facsimile of any photograph, negative or print, including instant photographs and videotapes of the body, or any portion of the body, of a deceased person, taken by or for the medical examiner at the scene of death or in the course of a post mortem examination or autopsy made by or caused to be made by the medical examiner except: when used in a criminal action or proceeding in this State which relates to the death of that person, for the use as a court of this State permits, by order after good cause has been shown and after written notification of the request for the court order has been served at least five days before the order is made upon the county prosecutor for the county in which the post mortem examination or autopsy occurred, for use in the field of forensic pathology or for use in medical or scientific education or research, or for use by any law enforcement agency in this State or any other state or federal law enforcement agency; criminal investigatory records; the portion of any criminal record concerning a person's detection, apprehension, arrest, detention, trial or disposition for unlawful manufacturing, distributing, or dispensing, or possessing or having under control with intent to manufacture, distribute, or dispense, marijuana or hashish in violation of paragraph (11) of subsection b. of N.J.S.2C:35-5, or a lesser amount of marijuana or hashish in violation of paragraph (12) of subsection b. of that section, or a violation of either of those paragraphs and a violation of subsection a. of section 1 of P.L.1987, c.101 (C.2C:35-7) or subsection a. of section 1 of P.L.1997, c.327 (C.2C:35-7.1) for distributing, dispensing, or possessing, or having under control with intent to distribute or dispense, on or within 1,000 feet of any school property, or on or within 500 feet of the real property comprising a public housing facility, public park, or public building, or for obtaining, possessing, using, being under the influence of, or failing to make lawful disposition of marijuana or hashish in violation of paragraph (3) or (4) of subsection a., or subsection b., or subsection c. of N.J.S.2C:35-10, or for a violation of any of those provisions and a violation of N.J.S.2C:36-2 for using or possessing with intent to use drug paraphernalia with that marijuana or hashish; victims' records, except that a victim of a crime shall have access to the victim's own records; any written request by a crime victim for a record to which the victim is entitled to access as provided in this section, including, but not limited to, any law enforcement agency report, domestic violence offense report, and temporary or permanent restraining order; personal firearms records, except for use by any person authorized by law to have access to these records or for use by any government agency, including any court or law enforcement agency, for purposes of the administration of justice; personal identifying information received by the Division of Fish and Wildlife in the Department of Environmental Protection in connection with the issuance of any license authorizing hunting with a firearm.  For the purposes of this paragraph, personal identifying information shall include, but not be limited to, identity, name, address, social security number, telephone number, fax number, driver's license number, email address, or social media address of any applicant or licensee; trade secrets and proprietary commercial or financial information obtained from any source.  For the purposes of this paragraph, trade secrets shall include data processing software obtained by a public body under a licensing agreement which prohibits its disclosure; any record within the attorney-client privilege.  This paragraph shall not be construed as exempting from access attorney or consultant bills or invoices except that such bills or invoices may be redacted to remove any information protected by the attorney-client privilege; administrative or technical information regarding computer hardware, software and networks which, if disclosed, would jeopardize computer security; emergency or security information or procedures for any buildings or facility which, if disclosed, would jeopardize security of the building or facility or persons therein; security measures and surveillance techniques which, if disclosed, would create a risk to the safety of persons, property, electronic data or software; information which, if disclosed, would give an advantage to competitors or bidders; information generated by or on behalf of public employers or public employees in connection with any sexual harassment complaint filed with a public employer or with any grievance filed by or against an individual or in connection with collective negotiations, including documents and statements of strategy or negotiating position; information which is a communication between a public agency and its insurance carrier, administrative service organization or risk management office; information which is to be kept confidential pursuant to court order; any copy of form DD-214, NGB-22, or that form, issued by the United States Government, or any other certificate of honorable discharge, or copy thereof, from active service or the reserves of a branch of the Armed Forces of the United States, or from service in the organized militia of the State, that has been filed by an individual with a public agency, except that a veteran or the veteran's spouse or surviving spouse shall have access to the veteran's own records; any copy of an oath of allegiance, oath of office or any affirmation taken upon assuming the duties of any public office, or that oath or affirmation, taken by a current or former officer or employee in any public office or position in this State or in any county or municipality of this State, including members of the Legislative Branch, Executive Branch, Judicial Branch, and all law enforcement entities, except that the full name, title, and oath date of that person contained therein shall not be deemed confidential; that portion of any document which discloses the social security number, credit card number, unlisted telephone number or driver license number of any person, or, in accordance with section 2 of P.L.2021, c.371 (C.47:1B-2), that portion of any document which discloses the home address, whether a primary or secondary residence, of any elected official, active, formerly active, or retired judicial officer, prosecutor, or law enforcement officer, or, as defined in section 1 of P.L.2021, c.371 (C.47:1B-1), any immediate family member thereof; except for use by any government agency, including any court or law enforcement agency, in carrying out its functions, or any private person or entity acting on behalf thereof, or any private person or entity seeking to enforce payment of court-ordered child support; except with respect to the disclosure of driver information by the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission as permitted by section 2 of P.L.1997, c.188 (C.39:2-3.4); and except that a social security number contained in a record required by law to be made, maintained or kept on file by a public agency shall be disclosed when access to the document or disclosure of that information is not otherwise prohibited by State or federal law, regulation or order or by State statute, resolution of either or both houses of the Legislature, Executive Order of the Governor, rule of court or regulation promulgated under the authority of any statute or executive order of the Governor; a list of persons identifying themselves as being in need of special assistance in the event of an emergency maintained by a municipality for public safety purposes pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2017, c.266 (C.40:48-2.67); and a list of persons identifying themselves as being in need of special assistance in the event of an emergency maintained by a county for public safety purposes pursuant to section 6 of P.L.2011, c.178 (C.App.A:9-43.13). A government record shall not include, with regard to any public institution of higher education, the following information which is deemed to be privileged and confidential: pedagogical, scholarly and/or academic research records and/or the specific details of any research project conducted under the auspices of a public higher education institution in New Jersey, including, but not limited to, research, development information, testing procedures, or information regarding test participants, related to the development or testing of any pharmaceutical or pharmaceutical delivery system, except that a custodian may not deny inspection of a government record or part thereof that gives the name, title, expenditures, source and amounts of funding and date when the final project summary of any research will be available; test questions, scoring keys and other examination data pertaining to the administration of an examination for employment or academic examination; records of pursuit of charitable contributions or records containing the identity of a donor of a gift if the donor requires non-disclosure of the donor's identity as a condition of making the gift provided that the donor has not received any benefits of or from the institution of higher education in connection with such gift other than a request for memorialization or dedication; valuable or rare collections of books or documents obtained by gift, grant, bequest or devise conditioned upon limited public access; information contained on individual admission applications; and information concerning student records or grievance or disciplinary proceedings against a student to the extent disclosure would reveal the identity of the student. "Personal firearms record" means any information contained in a background investigation conducted by the chief of police, the county prosecutor, or the Superintendent of State Police, of any applicant for a permit to purchase a handgun, firearms identification card license, or firearms registration; any application for a permit to purchase a handgun, firearms identification card license, or firearms registration; any document reflecting the issuance or denial of a permit to purchase a handgun, firearms identification card license, or firearms registration; and any permit to purchase a handgun, firearms identification card license, or any firearms license, certification, certificate, form of register, or registration statement.  For the purposes of this paragraph, information contained in a background investigation shall include, but not be limited to, identity, name, address, social security number, phone number, fax number, driver's license number, email address, social media address of any applicant, licensee, registrant or permit holder. "Public agency" or "agency" means any of the principal departments in the Executive Branch of State Government, and any division, board, bureau, office, commission or other instrumentality within or created by such department; the Legislature of the State and any office, board, bureau or commission within or created by the Legislative Branch; and any independent State authority, commission, instrumentality or agency.  The terms also mean any political subdivision of the State or combination of political subdivisions, and any division, board, bureau, office, commission or other instrumentality within or created by a political subdivision of the State or combination of political subdivisions, and any independent authority, commission, instrumentality or agency created by a political subdivision or combination of political subdivisions. "Law enforcement agency" means a public agency, or part thereof, determined by the Attorney General to have law enforcement responsibilities. "Law enforcement officer" means a person whose public duties include the power to act as an officer for the detection, apprehension, arrest and conviction of offenders against the laws of this State. "Constituent" means any State resident or other person communicating with a member of the Legislature. "Judicial officer" means any active, formerly active, or retired federal, state, county, or municipal judge, including a judge of the Tax Court and any other court of limited jurisdiction established, altered, or abolished by law, a judge of the Office of Administrative Law, a judge of the Division of Workers' Compensation, and any other judge established by law who serves in the executive branch. "Member of the Legislature" means any person elected or selected to serve in the New Jersey Senate or General Assembly. "Criminal investigatory record" means a record which is not required by law to be made, maintained or kept on file that is held by a law enforcement agency which pertains to any criminal investigation or related civil enforcement proceeding. "Victim's record" means an individually-identifiable file or document held by a victims' rights agency which pertains directly to a victim of a crime except that a victim of a crime shall have access to the victim's own records. "Victim of a crime" means a person who has suffered personal or psychological injury or death or incurs loss of or injury to personal or real property as a result of a crime, or if such a person is deceased or incapacitated, a member of that person's immediate family. "Victims' rights agency" means a public agency, or part thereof, the primary responsibility of which is providing services, including, but not limited to, food, shelter, or clothing, medical, psychiatric, psychological or legal services or referrals, information and referral services, counseling and support services, or financial services to victims of crimes, including victims of sexual assault, domestic violence, violent crime, child endangerment, child abuse or child neglect, and the Victims of Crime Compensation Board, established pursuant to P.L.1971, c.317 (C.52:4B-1 et seq.) and continued as the Victims of Crime Compensation Office pursuant to P.L.2007, c.95 (C.52:4B-3.2 et al.) and Reorganization Plan No. 001-2008. (cf: P.L.2021, c.371, s.10) 2.    Section 1 of P.L.2021, c.371 (C.47:1B-1) is amended to read as follows: 1.    a.  As used in this act, P.L.2021, c.371 (C.47:1B-1 et al.): "Authorized person" means a covered person or any of the following persons hereby authorized to submit or revoke a request for the redaction or nondisclosure of a home address on behalf of a covered person: (1)   on behalf of any federal judge, a designee of the United States Marshals Service or of the clerk of any United States District Court, provided that the designee submits the affirmation required under subsection d. of section 2 of P.L.2021, c.371 (C.47:1B-2) signed by each federal judge for whom a request or revocation is made; (2)   on behalf of any covered person who is deceased or medically or psychologically incapacitated, a person acting on behalf of the covered person as a designated trustee, as an estate executor, or pursuant to a written power of attorney or other legal instrument, provided that the person signs and submits the affirmation required under subsection d. of section 2 of P.L.2021, c.371 (C.47:1B-2) in the stead of the covered person; and (3)   on behalf of any immediate family member who is a minor and who is otherwise entitled to address redaction or nondisclosure pursuant to this act, the parent or legal guardian thereof. "Covered person" means an elected official, an active, formerly active, or retired judicial officer or law enforcement officer, as those terms are defined by section 1 of P.L.1995, c.23 (C.47:1A-1.1), or prosecutor and any immediate family member residing in the same household as the judicial officer, law enforcement officer, or prosecutor. "Immediate family member" means a spouse, child, or parent of, or any other family member related by blood or by law to, an elected official, an active, formerly active, or retired judicial officer or law enforcement officer, as defined by section 1 of P.L.1995, c.23 (C.47:1A-1.1), or prosecutor and who resides in the same household as the judicial officer, law enforcement officer, or prosecutor. b.    There is established in the Department of Community Affairs an office to be known as the Office of Information Privacy. The office shall be led by a director, who shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the Commissioner of Community Affairs and who may hire staff as necessary. c.     The director shall establish: (1)   a secure portal through which an authorized person may submit or revoke a request for the redaction or nondisclosure of a covered person's home address from certain records and Internet postings, as provided in section 2 of P.L.2021, c.371 (C.47:1B-2); and such requests shall not be subject to disclosure under P.L.1963, c.73 (C.47:1A-1 et seq.); (2)   a process by which an authorized person may petition the director for reconsideration of a denial of such request or any revocations thereof; (3)   a process by which a person or entity may request receipt of a record that does not contain redactions, or of information that is not disclosable, resulting from subsection a. of section 2 of P.L.2021, c.371 (C.47:1B-2); and (4)   a process for the evaluation of any other exceptions to the requirement for redaction or nondisclosure pursuant to section 2 of P.L.2021, c.371 (C.47:1B-2), whether categorical or individualized. The director may grant an exception to any person or entity for the receipt of the unredacted records or information pursuant to this process. d.    The director shall evaluate and either approve or deny a request submitted pursuant to subsection c. of this section and any revocations thereof. e.     (1)  The director may enter into any agreement or contract necessary to effectuate the purposes of this act. (2)   The director may issue any guidance, guidelines, decisions, or rules and regulations necessary to effectuate the purposes of this act. The rules and regulations shall be effective immediately upon filing with the Office of Administrative Law for a period not to exceed 18 months, and shall, thereafter, be amended, adopted, or readopted in accordance with the provisions of the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.).1 (cf: P.L.2021, c.371, s.1) 3.    Section 2 of P.L.2021, c.371 (C.47:1B-2) is amended to read as follows: 2.    a.  An authorized person seeking the redaction or nondisclosure of the home address of any covered person from certain records and Internet postings consistent with section 2 of P.L.2015, c.226 (C.47:1-17), section 1 of P.L.1995, c.23 (C.47:1A-1.1), or section 6 of P.L.2001, c.404 (C.47:1A-5) shall submit a request in accordance with section 1 of P.L.2021, c.371 (C.47:1B-1) to the Office of Information Privacy through the secure portal established by the office. The address shall only be subject to redaction or nondisclosure if a request is submitted to and approved by the Director of the Office of Information Privacy. b.    A public agency shall redact or cease to disclose, in accordance with section 6 of P.L.2001, c.404 (C.47:1A-5) and section 1 of P.L.1995, c.23 (C.47:1A-1.1), respectively, the home address of a covered person approved by the Office of Information Privacy not later than 30 days following the approval. A public agency shall also discontinue the redaction or nondisclosure of the home address of any covered person for whom a revocation request has been approved not later than 30 days following the approval. c.     An immediate family member who has sought and received approval under subsection a. of this section and who no longer resides with the elected official, active, formerly active, or retired judicial officer, prosecutor, or law enforcement officer shall submit through the portal a revocation request not later than 30 days from the date on which the immediate family member no longer resided with the elected official, judicial officer, prosecutor, or law enforcement officer. d.    A person submitting a request pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall affirm in writing that the person understands that certain rights, duties, and obligations are affected as a result of the request, including: (1)   the receipt of certain notices from non-governmental entities as would otherwise be required pursuant to the "Municipal Land Use Law," P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-1 et seq.); (2)   the signing of petitions related to the nomination or election of a candidate to public office or related to any public question; (3)   the eligibility or requirements related to seeking or accepting the nomination for election or election to public office, or the appointment to any public position; (4)   the sale or purchase of a home or other property, recordation of a judgment, lien or other encumbrance on real or other property, and any relief granted based thereon; (5)   the ability to be notified of any class action suit or settlement; and (6)   any other legal, promotional, or official notice which would otherwise be provided to the person but for the redaction or nondisclosure of such person's home address pursuant to subsection a. of this section. (cf: P.L.2021, c.371, s.2) 4.    This act shall take effect immediately.